Utah statutes.
20A-3-306.5.   Emergency absentee ballots.

(1)  As used in this section, "hospitalized voter" means a registered voter who is hospitalized or otherwise confined to a medical or long-term care institution after the deadline for filing an application for an absentee ballot established in Section 20A-3-304.

(2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, a hospitalized voter may obtain an absentee ballot and vote on election day by following the procedures and requirements of this section.

(3) (a)  Any person may obtain an absentee ballot application, an absentee ballot, and an absentee ballot envelope from the election officer on behalf of a hospitalized voter by requesting a ballot and application in person at the election officer's office.

(b)  The election officer shall require the person to sign a statement identifying himself and the hospitalized voter.

(4)  To vote, the hospitalized voter shall complete the absentee ballot application, complete and sign the application on the absentee ballot envelope, mark his votes on the absentee ballot, place the absentee ballot into the envelope, and seal the envelope.

(5)  To be counted, the absentee voter application and the sealed absentee ballot envelope must be returned to the election officer's office before the polls close on election day.

